Utah statutes.
78B-14-211 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify spousal-support order.

(1)  A tribunal of this state issuing a spousal-support order consistent with the law of this state has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the spousal-support order throughout the existence of the support obligation.

(2)  A tribunal of this state may not modify a spousal-support order issued by a tribunal of another state having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over that order under the law of that state.

(3)  A tribunal of this state that has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over a spousal-support order may serve as:

(a)  an initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce the spousal-support order issued in this state; or

(b)  a responding tribunal to enforce or modify its own spousal-support order.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

